Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-219
Barbering fees; set by board; enumerated.

The board shall set the fees to be paid:

(1) By an applicant for an examination to determine his or her fitness to receive a license to practice barbering or a registration as a barber instructor and for the issuance of the license or registration;

(2) By an applicant for registration as an assistant barber instructor;

(3) For the renewal of a license to practice barbering and for restoration of an inactive license;

(4) For the renewal of a registration to practice as a barber instructor and for the restoration of an inactive registration;

(5) For renewal of a registration to practice as an assistant barber instructor;

(6) For late renewal of a license issued under the Barber Act;

(7) For an application for a license to establish a barber shop or barber school and for the issuance of a license;

(8) For the transfer of license or change of ownership of a barber shop or barber school;

(9) For renewal of a barber license, barber instructor registration, barber shop license, or barber school license;

(10) For an application for a temporary license to conduct classes of instruction in barbering;

(11) For an affidavit for purposes of reciprocity or for issuance of a certification of licensure for purposes of reciprocity;

(12) For an application for licensure without examination pursuant to section 71-239.01 and for the issuance of a license pursuant to such section;

(13) For the sale of listings or labels; and

(14) For a returned check because of insufficient funds or no funds.

Laws 1927, c. 163, § 16, p. 433;

Laws 1929, c. 154, § 8, p. 537;

C.S.1929, § 71-2020;

Laws 1933, c. 121, § 1, p. 490;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 71-2020;

R.S.1943, § 71-219;

Laws 1953, c. 238, § 6, p. 827;

Laws 1957, c. 294, § 7, p. 1056;

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 23, p. 1324;

Laws 1965, c. 417, § 6, p. 1332;

Laws 1971, LB 1020, § 21;

Laws 1972, LB 1183, § 4;

Laws 1975, LB 66, § 3;

Laws 1978, LB 722, § 14;

Laws 1983, LB 87, § 23;

Laws 1993, LB 226, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 57;

Laws 2022, LB705, § 3.

Repeal of former act was valid. Day v. Walker, 124 Neb. 500, 247 N.W. 350 (1933).